Utah statutes.
62A-6-103.   Sterilization of persons under 18 years of age.
It is unlawful for a physician to sterilize a person who is under 18 years of
age unless:
(1)  the person is married or otherwise emancipated and the physician, through
careful examination and counseling, ensures that the person is capable of
giving informed consent.  If that person is institutionalized, the physician
shall also ensure that no undue influence or coercion to consent has been
placed on the person by nature of the fact that he is institutionalized; or
(2)  a petition has been filed in accordance with Section 62A-6-107, and an
order authorizing sterilization has been entered by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
